Hawaii statutes.
§412:5A-201 Application; fee;
approval. (a) No bank may establish a corporation to engage in foreign or
international banking and other foreign or international financial activities
unless it has filed an application with the commissioner and received approval
and authority to establish an international banking corporation and to exercise
the powers set forth in this part.

(b) The application shall be on a form
prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain any information that the
commissioner may require.

(c) In granting authority to a bank to
establish an international banking corporation, the commissioner may impose
such conditions that are in the public interest, including but not limited to
the filing of periodic reports or notices. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 2016,
c 149, §9]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next